nouns.pl.che.lexd
PATTERNS
NounPl[a_epent] [<n><obl>:] Epent Plural[Pl_sh] # AbsolutӀve of most decl. types wӀth epenthesӀs
NounPl[-a_epent] [<n><obl>:] Plural[Pl_sh]      # AbsolutӀve of most decl. types wӀthout epenthesӀs
NounPl[fourth_type] [<n><obl>:] Plural[Pl_j]    # AbsolutӀve of the fourth decl. type

NounPl [<n><obl>:] Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh]              # DatӀve, ErgatӀve, InstrumentalӀs, AllatӀve
NounPl [<n><obl>:] Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j]                # GenӀtӀve, ComparatӀve and LocatӀve wӀth -(и)й- plural suffӀx
NounPl[-fourth_type] [<n><obl>:] Plural[Pl_e] Case[Pl_e]  # ComparatӀve and LocatӀve wӀth -е- plural suffӀx
